Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1492.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE II-AUSE OF CRIMINAL RECORDS TO SCREEN TENANTSSection 201-A. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." An individual who is considered, or requests to 12345678910111213141516171819 be considered, for tenancy within a rental dwelling unit."Commission." The Pennsylvania Human Relations Commission."Criminal record." Information about an individual collected by criminal justice agencies consisting of identifiable descriptions and notations of arrests, detentions, indictments, criminal complaints or other formal criminal charges, and any disposition arising therefrom, including acquittal, sentencing, correctional supervision, release or conviction, including:(1) A sentence arising from a verdict or plea of guilty or nolo contendere.(2) A sentence of incarceration.(3) A suspended sentence.(4) A sentence of probation.(5) A sentence of conditional discharge."Housing provider." Any of the following:(1) A landlord, owner, lessor, sublessor or assignee or an agent of the landlord, owner, lessor, sublessor or assignee.(2) Any other person receiving or entitled to receive rents or benefits for the use or occupancy of a rental dwelling unit."Nondiscriminatory." Not discriminating against an applicant based on actual or perceived race, color, religious creed, ancestry, age, sex, national origin, non-job-related handicap or disability or the use of a guide or support animal because of the blindness, deafness or physical handicap of the user."Rental dwelling unit." A dwelling unit offered for rent by a housing provider for residential purposes, other than a dwelling unit in an owner-occupied premises of not more than four dwelling units.20250HB1492PN2549 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 202-A. Consideration of criminal records.(a) Permissible considerations.--(1) Except as provided in subsection (b), a housing provider may consider the criminal record of an applicant that involves a conviction SENTENCE ENFORCED under 18 Pa.C.S. § 7508 (relating to drug trafficking sentencing and penalties) resulting in a prison sentence if the prison sentence concluded within the seven years immediately preceding the consideration of a housing application by the applicant.(2) Except as provided in subsection (b), nothing in this section shall be construed to limit a housing provider's ability to consider other material factors in accordance with Federal or State law, including criminal records where the landlord has a substantial, legitimate and nondiscriminatory interest, such as convictions involving violent crimes, significant property damage or sexual offenses.(b) Prohibited considerations.--A housing provider may not consider any of the following in the criminal record of an applicant regarding a criminal offense under 18 Pa.C.S. § 7508:(1) An arrest or charge that did not result in a criminal conviction.(2) An expunged conviction.(3) A conviction for which an executive pardon has been granted.(4) A conviction that has been vacated or otherwise legally nullified.(5) An adjudication of juvenile delinquency.(6) A record that has been sealed.Section 203-A. Assessment.20250HB1492PN2549 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 A housing provider shall perform an individualized assessment of a housing application by an applicant in light of the following factors regarding a criminal offense under 18 Pa.C.S. § 7508 (relating to drug trafficking sentencing and penalties) contained in the criminal record of the applicant:(1) The nature and severity of the criminal offense.(2) The age of the applicant at the time of the occurrence of the criminal offense.(3) The time that has elapsed since the occurrence of the criminal offense.(4) Any information provided by the applicant, or on behalf of the applicant, regarding the applicant's rehabilitation and good conduct since the occurrence of the criminal offense.(5) The degree to which the criminal offense, if it reoccurred, would negatively impact the safety of the housing provider's other tenants or property.(6) Whether the criminal offense occurred on, or was connected to, property that was rented or leased by the applicant.Section 204-A. Evidence by applicant.An applicant may provide to a housing provider evidence of:(1) any inaccuracy within the criminal record of the applicant regarding an offense under 18 Pa.C.S. § 7508 (relating to drug trafficking sentencing and penalties) ; or (2) rehabilitation or other mitigating factors regarding the criminal record of the applicant regarding an offense under 18 Pa.C.S. § 7508.Section 205-A. Standards.A housing provider shall apply the standards established 20250HB1492PN2549 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under sections 202-A, 203-A and 204-A to each applicant in a nondiscriminatory manner.Section 206-A. Withdrawal of offer.(a) Permissible purpose.--A housing provider may withdraw an offer to an applicant following an individualized assessment in accordance with section 203-A if the housing provider determines, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the withdrawal is necessary to fulfill a substantial, legitimate and nondiscriminatory interest.(b) Notice.--If a housing provider withdraws an offer to an applicant, the housing provider shall provide the applicant with written notice of the withdrawal that includes:(1) The specific reason or reasons for the withdrawal.(2) An opportunity to appeal the withdrawal by providing to the housing provider evidence related to the criminal record of the applicant, in accordance with section 204-A.(c) Request.--(1) Within 30 days after a notice of withdrawal of an offer by a housing provider, an applicant may request that the housing provider provide the applicant with a copy of all the information on which the housing provider relied in considering the housing application and evaluating the applicant.(2) Within 10 days after receipt of a timely request under paragraph (1), the housing provider shall provide the information requested, free of charge.Section 207-A. Civil immunity.(a) Circumstances.--To encourage housing providers to provide housing opportunities to formerly incarcerated individuals who were convicted of an offense under 18 Pa.C.S. § 20250HB1492PN2549 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 7508 (relating to drug trafficking sentencing and penalties), a housing provider subject to the provisions of this article shall be immune from liability in a civil action arising as a result of the DIRECTLY RELATED TO A HOUSING PROVIDER'S decision to rent or lease to an individual who has a criminal record regarding an offense under 18 Pa.C.S. § 7508 or who was otherwise convicted of the criminal offense.(b) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the immunity from liability conferred by law upon a person who rents or leases an apartment to an individual with a conviction for an offense under 18 Pa.C.S. § 7508.(B) CONSTRUCTION.--THE IMMUNITY PROVIDED BY THIS SUBSECTION SHALL NOT EXTEND TO ANY PERSON WHO RENTS OR LEASES TO AN INDIVIDUAL WITH A SENTENCE ENFORCED UNDER 18 PA.C.S. § 7508 WHERE DAMAGES RESULT FROM GROSS NEGLIGENCE OR INTENTIONAL MISCONDUCT OF THE PERSON WHO RENTS OR LEASES TO AN INDIVIDUAL, OR IF THEY SHOULD HAVE HAD ACTUAL OR CONSTRUCTIVE KNOWLEDGE OF ILLEGAL ACTIVITIES.Section 208-A. Unlawful acts by housing provider.(a) Protected rights.--A housing provider may not interfere with, restrain or deny the exercise of, or the attempt to exercise, a right protected under this article.(b) Retaliatory action.--If the commission determines that a housing provider has engaged in one or more unlawful actions against a person with the intent of retaliating for the person's filing of an action against the housing provider in accordance with section 210-A, each unlawful retaliatory action shall be enforced, in accordance with section 210-A, as a separate and distinct violation of this article.Section 209-A. Complaint data maintenance.20250HB1492PN2549 - 6 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Data.--The commission shall maintain data on the number of complaints filed in accordance with this article, which must include the following:(1) Demographic information on the complainants.(2) The identity of the housing providers.(3) The number of investigations conducted.(4) The disposition of each complaint and investigation.(b) Publication.-- (1) The commission shall publish every two years and post on the commission's publicly accessible Internet website information on substantiated complaints that have resulted in the issuance of a monetary penalty in accordance with section 210-A.(2) The commission may not publish or post on the commission's publicly accessible Internet website information regarding a complaint against a housing provider for which the housing provider is in good faith compliance with the requirements made by the commission in accordance with section 210-A(a)(3)(ii).Section 210-A. Complaints and actions sought against housing provider.(a) Filing of complaint.-- (1) A person may not initiate in court an action that alleges a violation of this article.(2) Upon a belief that a housing provider has violated a provision of this article with respect to an applicant, the applicant may file a complaint with the commission against the housing provider.(3) Upon the filing of a complaint against a housing provider by an applicant, the commission shall make a good 20250HB1492PN2549 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 faith effort to provide notice to the housing provider of the alleged violation. The commission:(i) Shall offer the housing provider the opportunity to resolve the complaint within 14 days of receiving the notice.(ii) May not subject the housing provider to a penalty under subsection (e) if the housing provider resolves the complaint within 14 days of receiving the notice.(b) Warning .--If a housing provider does not resolve the complaint in accordance with subsection (a) and, following an investigation, the commission determines that the complaint is substantiated, the commission:(1) Shall issue a warning to the housing provider that the housing provider is in violation of this article and shall provide the housing provider the opportunity to resolve the complaint within 14 days of receiving the warning.(2) May not subject the housing provider to a penalty under subsection (e) if the housing provider resolves the complaint within 14 days of receiving the warning.(c) Issuance of penalty.--If a housing provider does not resolve the complaint within 14 days of receiving the warning in accordance with subsection (b), the commission:(1) Shall issue a monetary penalty against the housing provider.(2) May require the housing provider to take one or more of the actions authorized by subsection (f) . (d) Appeals generally.-- (1) A housing provider may appeal, in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of 20250HB1492PN2549 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth agency action), a final decision by the commission issued in accordance with this section.(2) A complainant under this section:(i) May appeal, in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. A, a finding by the commission, following an investigation by the commission, that the complaint is not substantiated.(ii) May not appeal a decision by the commission not to investigate the complaint.(e) Penalties.--A housing provider who violates a provision of this article shall be liable for the following applicable penalties:(1) An amount not to exceed $500 if the housing provider has not committed any prior violation within the five-year period ending on the date of the filing of the complaint.(2) An amount not to exceed $5,000 if the housing provider has committed one other violation within the five-year period ending on the date of the filing of the complaint.(3) An amount not to exceed $10,000 if the housing provider has committed two or more other violations within the seven-year period ending on the date of the filing of the complaint.(f) Requirement of action.--The commission may require a housing provider to take one or more of the following actions upon a finding that the housing provider has violated a provision of this article:(1) Any of the following:(i) Cease and desist from continuing to violate this article.20250HB1492PN2549 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Communicate in writing to the housing provider's employees and agents their obligations under this article.(iii) Report to the commission on the manner of compliance for a period not to exceed two years provided that the housing provider does not commit future violations of this article.(2) If the housing provider has committed at least one other violation of this article within the five-year period ending on the date of the filing of the complaint under this section, any of the following:(i) Make a good faith effort to remedy the violation, if a remedy is possible.(ii) Issue an offer, if the violation resulted in a failure to issue an offer.(iii) Provide the same or a similar rental dwelling unit on the same terms as the prior offer, if:(A) the same or similar rental dwelling unit is currently or will become available; and(B) the violation resulted in the withdrawal of an offer.(3) Unless the housing provider has provided a rental dwelling unit for the complainant, return the complainant's rental application fee.(4) Pay a portion of the sum owed by the housing provider in accordance with subsection (e) to the complainant, in an amount not to exceed $1,000.(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a housing provider is not subject to any penalty for a violation of this article if the provider, either prior to or within 14 20250HB1492PN2549 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 days following receipt of written notice of the alleged violation under this section, takes one or more of the following remedial actions:(1) if the violation involves the wrongful rejection of an applicant, the housing provider accepts the previously rejected applicant for the unit in question, provided the unit remains available and the applicant remains qualified;(2) if the unit originally applied for is no longer available, the housing provider agrees to offer the next available unit for which the applicant is qualified; or(3) if the violation arises from a policy or practice, the housing provider modifies or discontinues the policy or practice that caused the violation.(h) Successful appeal by housing provider.--I f a housing provider appeals a requirement made in accordance with subsection (f)(2) and the court overturns the requirement after determining that the housing provider did not violate the provisions of this article, the successful appeal shall be grounds for the housing provider to evict the former applicant if:(1) the former applicant resides in a rental dwelling unit of the housing provider; and(2) the housing provider provides the former applicant with at least 45 days' notice prior to the eviction.(i) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to bar, exclude or otherwise affect any right or action which may exist independently of any right or action under this section, including any right or action under the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act.20250HB1492PN2549 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 211-A. Rules and regulations.The commission shall adopt or promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this article.Section 212-A. Exemption.The provisions of this article do not apply to a housing provider that owns or operates 10 or less rental dwelling units in this Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in six months.20250HB1492PN2549 - 12 - 12345678